Rhode Island, session 2025, SB636.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-22.1-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-22.1 entitled "Pupil
Transportation Vehicles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-22.1-1. Pupil transportation vehicle — Definition.
A pupil transportation vehicle is a motor vehicle designed and constructed to seat not more
than eight (8) ten (10) passengers including plus the operator, used by a school committee to
provide the transportation services required by law or regulation to students being conveyed along
a fixed school transportation route. In particular, such vehicles may be used to provide the
transportation services required by § 16-21-1, § 16-21.1-1, et seq., and § 16-24-4 on routes in which
only small numbers of students are being conveyed.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001325
========